test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_CW_jooweshk_gt-norm.yaml
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonyshinaanbaniig, njooweshkoonymishnaanbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsshinaanbaniin, njooweshkoonsmishnaanbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsshinaanbaniing, njooweshkoonsmishnaanbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsshinaanbaniig, njooweshkoonsmishnaanbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshinaanbaniin, gjooweshkoonymishnaanbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshinaanbaniing, gjooweshkoonymishnaanbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshinaanbaniig, gjooweshkoonymishnaanbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshiwaabniin, gjooweshkoonymishwaabniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshiwaabniing, gjooweshkoonymishwaabniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshiwaabniig, gjooweshkoonymishwaabniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshinaanbaniin, gjooweshkoonsmishnaanbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshinaanbaniing, gjooweshkoonsmishnaanbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshinaanbaniig, gjooweshkoonsmishnaanbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshiwaabniin, gjooweshkoonsmishwaabniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshiwaabniing, gjooweshkoonsmishwaabniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshiwaabniig, gjooweshkoonsmishwaabniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonyshiwaabniin, jooweshkoonymishwaabniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonyshiwaabniing, jooweshkoonymishwaabniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px4: [jooweshkoonyshinwibniin, jooweshkoonymishniwbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px4: [jooweshkoonyshinwibniing, jooweshkoonymishniwbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonsshiwaabniin, jooweshkoonsmishwaabniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonsshiwaabniing, jooweshkoonsmishwaabniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px4: [jooweshkoonsshinwibniin, jooweshkoonsmishniwbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px4: [jooweshkoonsshinwibniing, jooweshkoonsmishniwbaniing]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7]
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7]
     
